Massachusetts, session 194th, S2019.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 6 of Chapter 62 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding after
subsection X the following new section:-
Section (y)
(1) In addition to any other credit allowed pursuant to this chapter, a taxpayer who
provides Family child care services may be allowed a credit equal to $3300 adjusted to the
consumer price index starting with the year that the credit is applicable to the person’s tax filing.
Any Family child care provider that receives a credit pursuant to this section for any taxable year
may carry over and apply to its tax due for any 1 or more of the next succeeding 3 taxable years
the portion, as reduced from year to year, of the credit that exceeds any tax due for the taxable
year.
of 2

(2) For the purposes of subsection (y), paragraph (1), “Family child care provider” and
"Family child care services” shall have the same meaning as under subsection (a) of Section 17
of Chapter 15D of the General Laws.
of 2